Rhode Island, session 2025, SB606.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-3-5.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-3 entitled "Vital
Records" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-3-5.1. Transfer of public historical documents.
(a) At the end of each calendar year, original records of births and marriages that have
occurred one hundred (100) years or more from the date of transfer and deaths that have occurred
fifty (50) years or more from the date of transfer, shall be permanently transferred by the state
registrar of vital records to the custody of the state archives under control of the secretary of state
who may promulgate rules and regulations pertaining to these public historical documents. In order
to preserve the integrity of historical public vital records, which are maintained at the Rhode Island
state archives, public historical vital records shall not be amended. Prior to transferring the records
to the state archives, the division of vital records shall ensure that an electronic copy of the records
is provided to all local registrars for the purpose of issuance of accurate copies, or certified copies,
to the public as authorized by law.
(b) Amendments to records on file with the local registrar, which are not available in
electronic format, shall be forwarded upon amendment to the local registrar for the purpose of
issuance of accurate copies, or certified copies, to the public as authorized by law.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001416
========
LC001416 - Page 2 of 3